trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
 <pardef n="schilo/d__adj">
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>dul</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>d</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>dului</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>adă</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ada</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ade</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>adei</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>zi</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>zii</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>zi</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>zilor</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ade</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>adele</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ade</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>adelor</l>
          <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="auri/u__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ul</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ului</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>e</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ei</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>iile</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ilor</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 <pardef n="no/u__adj">
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ul</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ului</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>uă</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ua</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ile</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ilor</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>
 <pardef n="vech/i__adj">
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>iul</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>iului</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ea</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ii</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ile</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ilor</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     </pardef>

 <e lm="nou">
        <i>no</i>
        <par n="no/u__adj"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="vechi">
        <i>vech</i>
        <par n="vech/i__adj"/>
      </e>
 <e lm="schilod">
        <i>schilo</i>
        <par n="schilo/d__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="argintiu">
        <i>arginti</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="chefliu" a="delnou">
        <i>chefli</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="cafeniu" a="delnou">
        <i>cafeni</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="cenușiu" a="delnou">
        <i>cenuși</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="mijlociu">
        <i>mijloci</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="notoriu">
        <i>notori</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="rectiliniu" a="delnou">
        <i>rectilini</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="timpuriu" a="delnou">
        <i>timpuri</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="aleatoriu">
        <i>aleatori</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="contradictoriu">
        <i>contradictori</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="obligatoriu">
        <i>obligatori</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="pirpiriu">
        <i>pirpiri</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="propriu">
        <i>propri</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="purpuriu">
        <i>purpuri</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="straniu">
        <i>strani</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="viu">
        <i>vi</i>
        <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
      </e>
<e lm="mediu" a="delnou">
  <i>medi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="zglobiu" a="delia">
  <i>zglobi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="alburiu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>alburi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="variu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>vari</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="arămiu" a="mioara">
  <i>arămi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="liliachiu" a="mioara">
  <i>liliachi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="târziu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>târzi</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="vinețiu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>vineți</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="respiratoriu" a="mioara">
  <i>respiratori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="discriminatoriu" a="mioara">
  <i>discriminatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="nediscriminatoriu" a="mioara">
  <i>nediscriminatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="non discriminatoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>non<b/>discriminatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="nondiscriminatoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>nondiscriminatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="postoperatoriu" a="mioara">
  <i>postoperatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="ambulatoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>ambulatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="post operatoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>post<b/>operatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="post-operatoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>post-operatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="derizoriu" a="mioara" r="LR">
  <i>derizori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="meritoriu" a="delia">
  <i>meritori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="tranzitoriu" a="delia">
  <i>tranzitori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="provizoriu" a="delia">
  <i>provizori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="trandafiriu" a="delia">
  <i>trandafiri</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="portocaliu" a="delia">
  <i>portocali</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="hazliu" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>hazli</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="fumuriu" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>fumuri</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="eliminatoriu" a="delia">
  <i>eliminatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="contrariu" a="delia" r="LR">
  <i>contrari</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
<e lm="operatoriu" a="delia">
  <i>operatori</i>
  <par n="auri/u__adj"/>
</e>
